Connecticut, session 2026, SB00417.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system that makes
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual
environments, (2) "artificial intelligence technology" means a computer
system, application or other product that uses or incorporates one or
more forms of artificial intelligence, and (3) "financial assistance" means
any and all forms of grants, extensions of credit, loans or loan
guarantees, equity investments or other forms of financing.
(b) The Department of Economic and Community Development, in
consultation with other relevant state agencies, public institutions of
higher education or any other public entity that the Department of
Economic and Community Development deems necessary, shall
develop a plan to establish an artificial intelligence small business
program for the purpose of (1) providing financial assistance to eligible
small businesses to adopt and deploy artificial intelligence to achieve
improvements in productivity and the quality of any products or

Senate Bill No. 417
services offered by such small businesses, and (2) establishing a
competitive small business environment for the development and
deployment of artificial intelligence technologies. Such plan shall
include, but need not be limited to, eligibility criteria and an application
process with guidelines and terms for financial assistance for the
program, and a requirement that, as a condition of receiving financial
assistance, any applicant train such applicant's employees to work with
artificial intelligence and prepare any such employees, whose jobs may
be displaced as a result of the adoption of artificial intelligence, for new
roles with the applicant.
(c) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Department of Economic and
Community Development shall report on such plan, including any
recommendations for legislative action required to implement such
plan, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to commerce.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Special Act No. 26-23 2 of 2